District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Targeted ANC 8A Moratorium Zone Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Subchapter III of Chapter 3 of Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code
is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“25-343.01. Targeted ANC 8A Moratorium Zone.”.
(b) New section 25-343.01 is added to read as follows:
“§ 25-343.01. Targeted ANC 8A Moratorium Zone.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term “Targeted ANC 8A Moratorium Zone”
means the area bounded as follows: Beginning at the intersection of the center line of the
Anacostia River and Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; then southeast along a line extending from such


intersection to the intersection of Anacostia Drive, S.E., and Nicholson Street, S.E.; then
southeast along Nicholson Street, S.E., to its intersection with White Place, S.E., and Minnesota
Avenue, S.E.; then northeast along the northeast-bound lanes of Minnesota Avenue, S.E.; then
south along 25th Street, S.E.; then south along Naylor Road, S.E.; then northwest along Good
Hope Road, S.E., to the northern corner of census block 75.02.1000; then south along the
western boundary of census block 75.02.1000 to Bruce Place, S.E.; then southwest along Bruce
Place, S.E.; then northwest along Fort Place, S.E.; then west along Erie Street, S.E.; then
northwest along Morris Road, S.E.; then southwest along West Street, S.E.; then northwest along
Howard Road, S.E.; then southwest along Bowen Road, S.E., to its next intersection with
Howard Road, S.E.; then northwest along Howard Road, S.E.; then southwest along Martin
Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.E.; then northwest along Suitland Parkway; then northwest along
South Capitol Street to the eastern bank of the Anacostia River; then east along the eastern bank
of the Anacostia River to 11th Street, S.E.; then northwest along 11th Street, S.E., to the center
line of the Anacostia River; then northeast along the center line of the Anacostia River to the
point of beginning.
“(b) The number of off-premises retailer’s licenses class A located within the Targeted
ANC 8A Moratorium Zone shall not exceed 3, and the number of off-premises retailer’s licenses
class B located within the Targeted ANC 8A Moratorium Zone shall not exceed one.
“(c) The restrictions set forth in this section shall not apply to an off-premises retailer
licensee, class A or B, that operates as a full-service grocery store, hotel, restaurant or tavern.
“(d) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue


rules to implement the provisions of this section. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the
Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of
Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in
part, by resolution, within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed
approved.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).